Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.095

Request for injunctive relief—Appellate proceeding—Service on the attorney general.

In any proceeding in which there is a request for injunctive relief under RCW 19.86.090, the attorney general shall be served with a copy of the initial pleading alleging a violation of this chapter. In any appellate proceeding in which an issue is presented concerning a provision of this chapter, the attorney general shall, within the time provided for filing the brief with the appellate court, be served with a copy of the brief of the party presenting such issue.

[ 1983 c 288 s 5.]

NOTES:

Short title—Purposes—1983 c 288: See note following RCW 19.86.090.